src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON св_нп_3c_Lxc
+V+Perf+IV:ну́ Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+IV:н Perf_Fut_1_shift ;

LEXICON св_нп_3a_Lxc
+V+Perf+IV:ну Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+IV:н Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

!====================================== Stem type 4 ======================================
!                                      говорить, etc.
! нсв_4 has present passive ppl's (with high/archaic register)

LEXICON нсв_4a
нсв_4a? ;

LEXICON нсв_4a_мучить
нсв_4a? ;
:а Impf_Pres_1_stem_Fac ;

LEXICON нсв_4as
нсв_4a? ;
+V+Impf+TV:е PastPass_нн_stem_Prb ;

LEXICON нсв_4a?
нсв_нп_4a ;
+V+Impf+TV:и Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_2_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:и PresPass_Ant ;

LEXICON нсв_4a_безл. ! TODO CHECK FIX can transitive impf impersonal verbs be passivized?
нсв_нп_4a_безл. ;
+V+Impf+TV:и Impf_Inf_V_stem_безл. ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_2_stem_безл. ;

LEXICON нсв_4a_R
+V+Impf+IV:и Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_stem_R ;

LEXICON нсв_4a_R_наст._1_ед._затрудн.
+V+Impf+IV:и Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_stem_R_1_ед._затрудн. ;

LEXICON нсв_4a_R_безл.
+V+Impf+IV:и Impf_Inf_stem_R_безл. ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_stem_R_безл. ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_4a
+V+Impf+IV:и Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_stem ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_4a_безл.
+V+Impf+IV:и Impf_Inf_V_stem_безл. ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_stem_безл. ;

LEXICON св_4a
св_нп_4a ;
+V+Perf+TV:и Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mе PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_4a_Impи
св_нп_4a_Impи ;
+V+Perf+TV:и Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_stem_Impи ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mе PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_4a_буд._1_ед._затрудн.
св_нп_4a_1_ед._затрудн. ;
+V+Perf+TV:и Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_stem_1_ед._затрудн. ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mе PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_4a_(-щ-)
св_нп_4a_(-щ-) ;
+V+Perf+TV:ти Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:щ Perf_Fut_2_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ще PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_4as
св_нп_4a ;
+V+Perf+TV:и Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mе PastPass_нн_stem_Prb ;

LEXICON св-нсв_4a
нсв_4a ;
св_4a ;

LEXICON св_4a_-мерить
+V+Perf+IV:ме́ри Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:ме́р Perf_Fut_2_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:меря́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ме́ри Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ме́р Perf_Fut_2_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:меря́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ме́р%^Mе PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_4a_-мучить
+V+Perf+IV:му́чи Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:му́ч Perf_Fut_2_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:муча́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:му́чи Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:му́ч Perf_Fut_2_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:муча́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:му́ч%^Mе PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_4a_R
+V+Perf+IV:и Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_stem_R ;

LEXICON св_4a_R_Impи
+V+Perf+IV:и Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_stem_R_Impи ;

LEXICON св_4a_R_буд._1_ед._затрудн.
+V+Perf+IV:и Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_stem_R_1_ед._затрудн. ;

LEXICON св_4a_R_безл.
+V+Perf+IV:и Perf_Inf_stem_R_безл. ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_stem_R_безл. ;

LEXICON св_4a_R_-мериться
+V+Perf+IV:ме́ри Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:ме́р Perf_Fut_2_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:меря́ Perf_Fut_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON св_4a_R_-мучиться
+V+Perf+IV:му́чи Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:му́ч Perf_Fut_2_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:муча́ Perf_Fut_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON св_нп_4a
+V+Perf+IV:и Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_stem ;

LEXICON св_нп_4a_Impи
+V+Perf+IV:и Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_stem_Impи ;

LEXICON св_нп_4a_1_ед._затрудн.
+V+Perf+IV:и Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_stem_1_ед._затрудн. ;

LEXICON св_нп_4a_(-щ-)
+V+Perf+IV:ти Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:щ Perf_Fut_2_stem ;

LEXICON св_4a_(-щ-)_R
+V+Perf+IV:ти Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:щ Perf_Fut_2_stem_R ;

LEXICON св_4a_прич._страд._-жд-
:д св_нп_4a ;
+V+Perf+TV:ди Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:д Perf_Fut_2_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:ждё PastPass_нн_end ;

LEXICON св_4a2
св_нп_4a2 ;
+V+Perf+TV:и Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_stem2 ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mе PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_нп_4a2
+V+Perf+IV:и Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_stem2 ;

LEXICON св_4a2_R
+V+Perf+IV:и Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_stem2_R ;

LEXICON нсв_4a[2]
нсв_нп_4a[2] ;
+V+Impf+TV:и Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_2_stem[2] ;

LEXICON нсв_4a[2]s
нсв_4a[2] ;
+V+Impf+TV:е PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_4a[2]
+V+Impf+IV:и Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_stem[2] ;

LEXICON нсв_4a[2]_R
+V+Impf+IV:и Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_stem[2]_R ;

LEXICON нсв_4a3
нсв_нп_4a3 ;
+V+Impf+TV:и Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_2_stem3 ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_4a3
+V+Impf+IV:и Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_stem3 ;

LEXICON нсв_4a3_R
+V+Impf+IV:и Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_stem3_R ;

LEXICON нсв_4a[3]
нсв_нп_4a[3] ;
+V+Impf+TV:и Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_2_stem[3] ;

LEXICON нсв_4a[3]s
нсв_4a[3] ;
+V+Impf+TV:е PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_4a[3]
+V+Impf+IV:и Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_stem[3] ;

LEXICON нсв_4a[3]_R
+V+Impf+IV:и Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_stem[3]_R ;

LEXICON св_4a[2]
св_нп_4a[2] ;
+V+Perf+TV:и Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_stem[2] ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mе PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_4a[2]_R
+V+Perf+IV:и Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_stem[2]_R ;

LEXICON св_нп_4a[2]
+V+Perf+IV:и Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_stem[2] ;

LEXICON св_4a3
св_нп_4a3 ;
+V+Perf+TV:и Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_stem3 ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mе PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_4a3_R
+V+Perf+IV:и Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_stem3_R ;

LEXICON св_нп_4a3
+V+Perf+IV:и Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_stem3 ;

LEXICON св_4a[3]
св_нп_4a[3] ;
+V+Perf+TV:и Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_stem[3] ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mе PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_4a[3][7]
св_4a[3] ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mё PastPass_нн_stem_Fac ;

LEXICON св_4a[3]_R
+V+Perf+IV:и Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_stem[3]_R ;

LEXICON св_нп_4a[3]
+V+Perf+IV:и Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_stem[3] ;

LEXICON св_4a7
: св_нп_4a ;
+V+Perf+TV:и Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mё PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON нсв_4b
нсв_4b? ;
! TODO FIX CHECK pastpass participle?

LEXICON нсв_4b_Impи
нсв_4b?_Impи ;
! TODO FIX CHECK pastpass participle?

LEXICON нсв_4bs
нсв_4b? ;
+V+Impf+TV:%^Mё PastPass_нн_end_Prb ;

LEXICON нсв_4b?
нсв_нп_4b ;
+V+Impf+TV:и́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_2_end_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:и́ PresPass_Ant ;

LEXICON нсв_4b?_Impи
нсв_нп_4b ;
+V+Impf+TV:и́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_2_end_w/Pass_Impи ;
+V+Impf+TV:и́ PresPass_Ant ;

LEXICON нсв_4b8
нсв_нп_4b ;
+V+Impf+TV:и́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_2_end_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:и́ PresPass_Ant ;
+V+Impf+TV:%^Mе PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON нсв_4b8_Impи
нсв_нп_4b_Impи ;
+V+Impf+TV:и́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_2_end_w/Pass_Impи ;
+V+Impf+TV:и́ PresPass_Ant ;
+V+Impf+TV:%^Mе PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON нсв_4b_R
+V+Impf+IV:и́ Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_end_R ;

LEXICON нсв_4b_R_Impи
+V+Impf+IV:и́ Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_end_R_Impи ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_4b
+V+Impf+IV:и́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_end ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_4b_Impи
+V+Impf+IV:и́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_end_Impи ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_4b_имеется_прич._страд._наст.
+V+Impf+IV:и́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_end ;
+V+Impf+IV:и́ PresPass ;

LEXICON св_4b
св_4b? ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mё PastPass_нн_end ;

LEXICON св_4b_Impи
св_4b?_Impи ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mё PastPass_нн_end ;

LEXICON св_4bs
св_4b? ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mё PastPass_нн_end_Prb ;

LEXICON св_4b?
св_нп_4b ;
+V+Perf+TV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_end ;

LEXICON св_4b?_Impи
св_нп_4b_Impи ;
+V+Perf+TV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_end_Impи ;
