src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verb
мутузить:муту́з нсв_4a ;
румянить:румя́н нсв_4a ;
мучить:му́ч нсв_4a_мучить "weight: 3.01748857923186" ;
знакомиться:знако́м нсв_4a_R "weight: 2.1695795618837748" ;
лохматиться:лохма́т нсв_4a_R "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
бредиться:бре́д нсв_4a_R_безл. ;
таланиться:тала́н нсв_4a_R_безл. ;
чудиться:чу́д нсв_4a_R_наст._1_ед._затрудн. "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
лихорадить:лихора́д нсв_4a_безл. "weight: 1.429216872389531" ;
стопорить:сто́пор нсв_4a3 "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
убыточить:убы́точ нсв_4a3 "weight: 1.429216872389531" ;
сахариться:са́хар нсв_4a3_R ;
стопориться:сто́пор нсв_4a3_R ;
лямзить:ля́мз нсв_4a? ;
ляпсить:ля́пс нсв_4a? ;
бесчестить:бесче́ст нсв_4a[2] ;
чихвостить:чихво́ст нсв_4a[2] ;
подпортиться:подпо́рт нсв_4a[2]_R ;
корчиться:ко́рч нсв_4a[2]_R "weight: 1.8271568810615688" ;
застить:за́ст нсв_4a[2]s ;
таращить:тара́щ нсв_4a[3] "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
топорщить:топо́рщ нсв_4a[3] "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
таращиться:тара́щ нсв_4a[3]_R "weight: 1.7302468680535124" ;
топорщиться:топо́рщ нсв_4a[3]_R "weight: 1.5261268853975876" ;
неводить:не́вод нсв_4a[3]s ;
паузить:па́уз нсв_4a[3]s ;
узить:у́з нсв_4as "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
мирить:мир нсв_4b "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
струить:стру́ нсв_4b_Impи "weight: 1.6053081314452122" ;
струиться:стру́ нсв_4b_R_Impи "weight: 3.0872282690466433" ;
томошиться:томош нсв_4b_R ;
кроить:кро́ нсв_4b8_Impи "weight: 1.5261268853975876" ;
гатить:га́т нсв_4b8 ;
мнить:мн нсв_4b? "weight: 3.0285540053820204" ;
богатить:богат нсв_4bs ;
хулиганить:хулига́н нсв_нп_4a "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
метить:ме́т нсв_нп_4a "weight: 2.534727057159505" ;
сбоить:сбо́ нсв_нп_4b_Impи ;
шустрить:шустр нсв_нп_4b ;
руководить:руковод нсв_нп_4b_имеется_прич._страд._наст. "weight: 3.826722369287551" ;
обессмыслить:обессмы́сл св_4a "weight: 1.7813993905008936" ;
выпоить:вы́по св_4a_Impи ;
выкроить:вы́кро св_4a_Impи "weight: 2.0576058024398427" ;
законопатить:законопа́т св_4a "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
нацелиться:наце́л св_4a_R "weight: 1.8685495662197937" ;
выкроиться:вы́кро св_4a_R_Impи ;
выроиться:вы́ро св_4a_R_Impи ;
заспориться:заспо́р св_4a_R ;
примериться:при св_4a_R_-мериться ;
помериться:по св_4a_R_-мериться "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
домучиться:до св_4a_R_-мучиться ;
умучиться:у св_4a_R_-мучиться ;
распогодиться:распого́д св_4a_R_безл. "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
запритчиться:запри́тч св_4a_R_безл. ;
почудиться:почу́д св_4a_R_буд._1_ед._затрудн. ;
обуржуазиться:обуржуа́з св_4a_R_буд._1_ед._затрудн. "weight: 1.5261268853975876" ;
умилосердить:умилосе́рд св_4a_буд._1_ед._затрудн. ;
выморозить:вы́мороз св_4a2 "weight: 1.6053081314452122" ;
выстроить:вы́стро св_4a2 "weight: 3.906699888464475" ;
выутюжиться:вы́утюж св_4a2_R ;
выморозиться:вы́мороз св_4a2_R ;
вывялить:вы́вял св_4a3 ;
подсахарить:подса́хар св_4a3 "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
выпялиться:вы́пял св_4a3_R ;
обсахариться:обса́хар св_4a3_R ;
понудить:пону́%^D св_4a7 "weight: 1.429216872389531" ;
перепортить:перепо́рт св_4a[2] "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
перечистить:перечи́ст св_4a[2] "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
испортиться:испо́рт св_4a[2]_R "weight: 2.0312768637174936" ;
отчиститься:отчи́ст св_4a[2]_R ;
разлакомить:разла́ком св_4a[3] ;
замусорить:заму́сор св_4a[3] "weight: 2.653231683762395" ;
разлакомиться:разла́ком св_4a[3]_R ;
вытаращиться:вы́таращ св_4a[3]_R "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
осведомить:осве́дом св_4a[3][7] "weight: 3.698729816607447" ;
сглазить:сгла́з св_4as "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
излазить:изла́з св_4as ;
нагноить:нагно́ св_4b_Impи ;
развратить:развра%^T св_4b "weight: 2.7136476062340504" ;
намутить:намут св_4b? ;
подкузьмить:подкузьм св_4bs ;
нахулиганить:нахулига́н св_нп_4a ;
почудачить:почуда́ч св_нп_4a ;
зазуммерить:зазу́ммер св_нп_4a3 "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
сдрейфить:сдре́йф св_нп_4a[3] ;
примерить:при св_4a_-мерить "weight: 1.7813993905008936" ;
отмерить:от св_4a_-мерить "weight: 2.852462746326339" ;
размучить:раз св_4a_-мучить ;
домучить:до св_4a_-мучить "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
ранить:ра́н св-нсв_4a "weight: 4.238776587024798" ;
таранить:тара́н св-нсв_4a "weight: 1.7302468680535124" ;
